District of Columbia statutes.
42-1217

Extension of time for recordation; Saturday, Sunday, and legal holidays.

Any writing, the time for recording of which expires on a Saturday, or on a Sunday, shall be deemed to have been recorded within the time prescribed if such writing be recorded on the first day thereafter other than Sunday or a legal holiday.

Aug. 2, 1946, 60 Stat. 861, ch. 758, § 2
1981 Ed., § 45-914.
1973 Ed., § 45-713.